Georgia, session 2025_26, HB406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
8 SECTION 1.
9 Chapter 23 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Georgia
10 Judicial Retirement System, is amended by revising Code Section 47-23-45, relating to effect
11 of change in employment, as follows:
12 "47-23-45.
13 Any member of this retirement system shall be entitled to remain as a member by holding
14 any position or office covered by the fund and shall receive full credit for all service as a
15 member despite his or her change from one position or office to another covered by the
H. B. 406 (SUB)
- 1 -

25 LC 56 0335S
16 fund. Upon becoming eligible for retirement, however, retirement benefits shall be
17 determined in accordance with Code Sections 47-23-101 and, 47-23-102, and 47-23-102.1."
18 SECTION 2.
19 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 47-23-102, relating to vesting,
20 benefits upon retirement, and compliance with federal income tax laws, as follows:
21 "47-23-102.
22 (a) This Code section shall only apply to an individual who first became a member before
23 the effective date of this Act.
24 (b) The right of a member to receive benefits under this chapter shall vest after the member
25 obtains ten years of creditable service; provided, however, that no member shall receive
26 a retirement benefit prior to attaining the age of 60 years. Except as otherwise provided
27 in Article 2 of Chapter 1 of this title, a member's accumulated contributions shall be 100
28 percent vested and nonforfeitable at all times. Any member retiring on or after
29 July 1, 1996, and any member who was retired on July 1, 1996, with 16 years or more of
30 creditable service shall receive a benefit equal to 66.66 percent, plus 1 percent for each year
31 of creditable service over 16 years, of the member's salary; provided, however, that no
32 member shall receive more than 24 years of creditable service. Any member retiring with
33 less than 16 years of creditable service may retire at a reduced benefit pursuant to Code
34 Section 47-23-103. Normal retirement age under this retirement system shall be the date
35 the member has reached age 60 years of age, provided that he or she has at least ten years
36 of creditable service. For purposes of Section 402(1) of the federal Internal Revenue Code
37 regarding distributions from governmental plans for health and long-term care insurance
38 for public safety officers, normal retirement age shall be the earliest date when the member
39 has satisfied the requirements for a retirement under this or the predecessor retirement
40 system. Except as otherwise provided in Article 2 of Chapter 1 of this title, a member's
41 right to his or her retirement allowance is nonforfeitable upon attainment of normal
H. B. 406 (SUB)
- 2 -

25 LC 56 0335S
42 retirement age. Any member who was retired on July 1, 1996, with more than 16 years of
43 creditable service shall receive in July, 1998, a one-time benefit payment equal to two
44 times the product of 1 percent of the salary paid to such judge at the time of his or her
45 retirement multiplied by the number of years of creditable service in excess of 16 years.
46 (b)(c) The board is authorized to provide by rule or regulation for the payment of benefits
47 to members or beneficiaries of the retirement system at a time and under circumstances not
48 provided for in this chapter to the extent that such payment is required to maintain the
49 retirement system as a qualified retirement plan for the purposes of federal income tax laws
50 and regulations."
51 SECTION 3.
52 Said chapter is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
53 "47-23-102.1.
54 (a) This Code section shall only apply to an individual who first becomes a member on or
55 after the effective date of this Act.
56 (b) The right of a member to receive benefits under this chapter shall vest after the member
57 obtains ten years of creditable service; provided, however, that no member shall receive
58 a retirement benefit prior to attaining the age of 60 years. Except as otherwise provided
59 in Article 2 of Chapter 1 of this title, a member's accumulated contributions shall be 100
60 percent vested and nonforfeitable at all times. Any member retiring with 16 years or more
61 of creditable service shall receive a benefit equal to 66.66 percent, plus 1 percent for each
62 year of creditable service over 16 years, of the member's salary; provided, however, that
63 no member shall receive more than 24 years of creditable service. Any member retiring
64 with less than 16 years of creditable service may retire at a reduced benefit pursuant to
65 Code Section 47-23-103. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, normal
66 retirement age under this retirement system shall be the date the member has reached 60
67 years of age, provided that he or she has at least ten years of creditable service. For
H. B. 406 (SUB)
- 3 -

25 LC 56 0335S
68 purposes of Section 402(1) of the federal Internal Revenue Code regarding distributions
69 from governmental plans for health and long-term care insurance for public safety officers,
70 normal retirement age shall be the earliest date when the member has satisfied the
71 requirements for a retirement under this retirement system.
72 (c) On the effective date of a member's retirement, as provided for in subsection (b) of
73 Code Section 47-23-103, such member's monthly retirement benefit shall be calculated as
74 follows:
75 (1) If a member is over the age of 65 years on his or her effective date of retirement, or
76 has attained the age of 65 years after his or her effective date of retirement, such member
77 shall receive the full amount of the benefit calculated pursuant to subsection (b) of this
78 Code section; or
79 (2) If a member has not yet attained the age of 65 years on his or her effective date of
80 retirement, the monthly retirement benefit shall be calculated pursuant to subsection (b)
81 of this Code section using only the years of creditable service attributable to such
82 member's service in any covered position except for as a superior court judge.
83 (d) The board is authorized to provide by rule or regulation for the payment of benefits to
84 members or beneficiaries of the retirement system at a time and under circumstances not
85 provided for in this chapter to the extent that such payment is required to maintain the
86 retirement system as a qualified retirement plan for the purposes of federal income tax laws
87 and regulations."
88 SECTION 4.
89 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 47-23-103, relating to retirement
90 based on age and application to retire, as follows:
91 "47-23-103.
92 (a) In lieu of retirement at the benefit level provided by Code Section 47-23-102 or
93 47-23-102.1, a member may retire at any time after attaining the age of 60 years and after
H. B. 406 (SUB)
- 4 -

25 LC 56 0335S
94 obtaining a minimum of ten years of creditable service. The monthly retirement benefit
95 for such early retirement shall be a percentage of either the benefit under Code Section
96 47-23-102 if such member first became a member before the effective date of this Act or
97 the benefit under subsection (c) of Code Section 47-23-102.1 if such member first became
98 a member on or after the effective date of this Act, and such percentage shall be the
99 proportion which the number of years of creditable service the member has in the
100 retirement system bears to 16.
101 (b) The effective date of retirement shall be the first day of the month in which the
102 application is received by the board of trustees, provided that no retirement shall, in any
103 case, be effective earlier than the first day of the month following the final month of the
104 applicant's employment. Applications for retirement shall not be accepted more than 90
105 days in advance of the effective date of retirement."
106 SECTION 5.
107 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 47-23-104, relating to disability,
108 determination of benefits, and determining disability, as follows:
109 "47-23-104.
110 (a) After obtaining a minimum of four years of creditable service, any member who
111 becomes totally and permanently disabled to the extent that he or she is unable to perform
112 the duties of his or her office shall be entitled to receive a disability retirement benefit
113 which shall be one-half of the maximum retirement benefits provided by Code Section
114 47-23-102 or 47-23-102.1 for 16 years of service, unless the member would otherwise
115 qualify for a greater benefit under Code Section 47-23-102 if such member first became
116 a member before the effective date of this Act, Code Section 47-23-102.1 if such member
117 first became a member on or after the effective date of this Act, or Code Section
118 47-23-103, in which event the Code section providing the highest benefit would apply.
H. B. 406 (SUB)
- 5 -

25 LC 56 0335S
119 (b) After obtaining a minimum of ten years of actual service, any member who becomes
120 totally and permanently disabled to the extent that he or she is unable to perform the duties
121 of his or her office shall be entitled to receive a disability retirement benefit which shall be
122 two-thirds of the maximum retirement benefits provided by Code Section 47-23-102 or
123 47-23-102.1.
124 (c) The disability of any member applying for disability retirement benefits shall be
125 determined by the board in the same manner and under the same procedure as disability of
126 state employees is determined in accordance with the applicable provisions of the
127 Employees' Retirement System of Georgia. Disability retirement benefits shall become
128 effective on the first day of the month following the month the member resigns as a result
129 of the disability."
130 SECTION 6.
131 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 47-23-105.1, relating to
132 modification of retirement allowance, as follows:
133 "47-23-105.1.
134 (a) The provisions of this Code section shall apply only to persons who become members
135 of this retirement system on or after July 1, 2012.
136 (b) A member may make a one-time election to convert the retirement allowance
137 otherwise payable to him or her into a modified retirement allowance of equivalent
138 actuarial value and designate a natural person to receive a survivors benefit in accordance
139 with one of the options set forth in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this subsection. Such
140 retirement allowance shall be actuarially reduced in accordance to the designated survivor's
141 projected life span. For any member whose benefit amount is calculated pursuant to Code
142 Section 47-23-102.1, such actuarial adjustment shall account for any increase in the benefit
143 amount accruing to such member when he or she attains the age of 65 years. Such actuarial
144 adjustment shall be computed upon the basis of the mortality tables and rates of interest last
H. B. 406 (SUB)
- 6 -

25 LC 56 0335S
145 adopted by the board of trustees. Such election may be made only after the member has
146 become eligible to retire and before the first payment of his or her retirement allowance
147 normally becomes due. Such election shall be irrevocable except as otherwise provided
148 in this Code section.
149 (1) Option one, known as the 100 percent joint and survivor option, shall consist of a
150 reduced retirement allowance which is payable during the life of the retired member and
151 which, upon his or her death, shall be continued at the same rate throughout the life of
152 and paid to the designated survivor.
153 (2) Option two, known as the 66 2/3 percent joint and survivor option, shall consist of
154 a reduced retirement allowance which is payable during the life of the retired member and
155 which, upon his or her death, shall be continued at the rate of two-thirds the reduced
156 retirement allowance throughout the life of and paid to the designated survivor.
157 (3) Option three, known as the 50 percent joint and survivor option, shall consist of a
158 reduced retirement allowance which is payable during the life of the retired member and
159 which, upon his or her death, shall be continued at the rate of one-half the reduced
160 retirement allowance throughout the life of and paid to the designated survivor.
161 (4) Option four, known as the pop-up option, shall be the election of options one, two,
162 or three, with the added provision that in the event the designated survivor predeceases
163 the retired member, the retirement allowance payable to the retired member after the
164 death of the designated survivor shall be equal to the maximum retirement allowance
165 which the retired member would have been entitled to receive under this chapter had such
166 election not been made.
167 (c) In the event a member is not married at the time he or she retires and the retired
168 member does not elect a survivor's option and such member subsequently marries, the
169 retired member may elect to begin receiving an actuarially reduced benefit of equivalent
170 value and establish on behalf of the newly acquired spouse an option under this Code
171 section. Such election shall be made within six months after the marriage.
H. B. 406 (SUB)
- 7 -

25 LC 56 0335S
172 (d) In the event a retired member makes an election under subsection (b) of this Code
173 section on behalf of a spouse and such spouse predeceases the retired member and the
174 retired member subsequently remarries, the retired member may elect to begin receiving
175 an actuarially reduced benefit of equivalent value and establish on behalf of a new
176 designated survivor pursuant to an option under this Code section.
177 (e) In the event a retired member makes an election under subsection (b) of this Code
178 section on behalf of a spouse and a final judgment of complete divorce from the spouse is
179 entered, then:
180 (1) The retired member may elect to continue the optional allowance with the former
181 spouse designated to receive all amounts and benefits upon the death of the retired
182 member; or
183 (2) The retired member may revoke the appointment of such spouse as a beneficiary;
184 provided, however, that in such event the retirement benefit received by the retired
185 member shall not increase. Such revocation may be made at any time after the entry of
186 the final judgment of divorce. If the retired member elects to revoke the election, the
187 spouse shall be treated in the same manner as if he or she had predeceased the retired
188 member under subsection (d) of this Code section.
189 (f) If an active vested member of this retirement system dies and is survived by a legal
190 spouse, such spouse shall receive a benefit as if the member has retired on the date of his
191 or her death, had attained the age of 65, and had elected option three."
192 SECTION 7.
193 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 47-23-106, relating to county
194 supplement of salaries, as follows:
195 "47-23-106.
196 (a) Whenever any county within a judicial circuit supplements the state salary paid to
197 active superior court judges or the district attorney of said circuit, the governing authority
H. B. 406 (SUB)
- 8 -

25 LC 56 0335S
198 of such county shall be authorized, but not required, to supplement the benefit being paid
199 pursuant to this chapter to any retired superior court judge or district attorney of said circuit
200 who is receiving benefits pursuant to this chapter or to supplement the benefit being paid
201 pursuant to this chapter to any beneficiary of any deceased superior court judge or district
202 attorney.
203 (b) Whenever any county which has a state court supplements the salary of the judges or
204 solicitors-general of such court, the governing authority of such county shall be authorized,
205 but not required, to supplement the benefit being paid pursuant to this chapter to any retired
206 state court judge of such court who is receiving benefits pursuant to this chapter or
207 supplement the benefit being paid pursuant to this chapter to any beneficiary of any
208 deceased state court judge.
209 (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section, for any
210 single county judicial circuit where the county site is located in an unincorporated area of
211 the county and the county governing authority has constructed one or more permanent
212 satellite courthouses within the county, said county shall supplement the benefit amount
213 being paid pursuant to this chapter to any district attorney who retired from such circuit.
214 The amount of the supplement shall be determined by multiplying the benefit percentage
215 he or she earned pursuant to Code Section 47-23-102 if such member first became a
216 member before the effective date of this Act or Code Section 47-23-102.1 if such member
217 first became a member on or after the effective date of this Act at retirement together with
218 the aggregate county salary supplement being paid to the active district attorney on the date
219 that he or she begins receiving a retirement benefit or the supplement paid to the retiring
220 district attorney upon his or her last day of service as district attorney, whichever is greater.
221 The supplement shall not be payable to a spouse or survivor pursuant to the provisions of
222 Code Section 47-23-105."
H. B. 406 (SUB)
- 9 -

25 LC 56 0335S
223 SECTION 8.
224 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 406 (SUB)
- 10 -